Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-532
Notice of judgment when property situated in more than one county.

When any part of the real property, the subject matter of an action, is situated in any other county or counties than the one in which the action is brought, a certified copy of the judgment in such action must be recorded in the clerk's office of such other county or counties before it shall operate therein as a notice, so as to charge third persons as provided in section 25-531. It shall operate as such notice without record in the county where it is rendered; but this section shall not apply to actions or proceedings under any statute now in force which does not require such record.

R.S.1867, Code § 86, p. 407;

R.S.1913, § 7652;

C.S.1922, § 8596;

C.S.1929, § 20-532;

R.S.1943, § 25-532.